Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1715
Escrow of deposits; surety bond.

(1) Any deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation of a time-share interval from a developer shall be placed in escrow, in an account designated solely for that purpose, in an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality, until (a) delivered to the developer at the expiration of the time for rescission or any later time specified in any contract or sale, (b) delivered to the developer because of the purchaser's default under a contract to purchase the time-share interval, or (c) refunded to the purchaser. The developer shall register such escrow bank account with the commission and authorize the commission to examine the account.

(2) The escrow account shall be held in this state, except that the escrow account may be held in another state where the time-share project is located if (a) the account is designated solely for that purpose and is insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality, (b) the escrow agent is subject to the personal jurisdiction and venue of the district court in Nebraska located in the county of the purchaser's residence or principal office, and (c) the commission is authorized to examine the account.

(3) In lieu of placing deposits in an escrow account, the commission may accept from the developer a surety bond, issued by a company authorized and licensed to do business in this state, in an amount equal to fifty thousand dollars to cover any default by the developer to refund a deposit made in connection with a purchase or reservation of a time-share interval.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 68, § 7.